Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1099.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3102(2) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 3102. Obedience to authorized persons directing traffic.No person shall willfully fail or refuse to comply with any lawful order or direction of:* * *(2) any appropriately attired person, including an agent or employee of the funeral director during a funeral or a designated member of an organized motorcycle procession under section 3107.1 (relating to drivers in organized motorcycle processions), authorized to direct, control or regulate traffic;1234567891011121314151617181920 * * *Section 2. Title 75 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 3107.1. Drivers in organized motorcycle processions. (a) Operation.-- Except in cities of the first class and second class, the driver of a vehicle or motorcycle that is being driven in an organized motorcycle procession may:(1) Park or stand irrespective of the provisions of this part.(2) Proceed past a red signal indication or stop sign if the lead vehicle or motorcycle in the procession started through the intersection while the signal indicator was green or, in the case of a stop sign, the lead vehicle or motorcycle first came to a complete stop before proceeding through the intersection.(b) Visual signals required.--The privileges granted under this section shall apply only if the lead and trailing vehicle or motorcycle in an organized motorcycle procession display lighted head lamps and emergency flashers. All participants are required to have lighted head lamps and emergency flashers, if so equipped.(c) Right-of-way to emergency vehicles.--This section does not relieve the driver of a vehicle or motorcycle which is being driven in an organized motorcycle procession from yielding the right-of-way to an emergency vehicle making use of audible and visual signals or from the duty to drive with due regard for the safety of all persons.(d) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Organized motorcycle procession." A group of no fewer than 20250SB1099PN1329 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 10 motorcycle drivers, not including the lead or trailing vehicle or motorcycle, that meets all of the following requirements:(1) The procession must be conducted between the hours of 8 a.m. and sunset.(2) The sponsor of the procession must notify the affected municipalities of the planned procession no later than three days before the commencement of a funeral procession and 14 days before the commencement of a charitable procession.(3) The procession must be sponsored by a corporation or a nonprofit organization.(4) The procession must be conducted for memorial or charitable purposes.(5) At least 10% of the total number of motorcycle drivers in the procession must wear a class 2 or higher yellow reflective vest approved for use by the American National Standards Institute.Section 3. Section 3310(c) of Title 75 is amended to read:§ 3310. Following too closely.* * *(c) Caravans and motorcades.--Upon any roadway outside of an urban district, motor vehicles being driven in a caravan or motorcade, whether or not towing other vehicles, shall be so operated as to allow sufficient space between each vehicle or combination of vehicles so as to enable any other vehicle to enter and occupy space without danger. This subsection does not apply to funeral processions under section 3107 (relating to drivers in funeral processions) or organized motorcycle processions under section 3107.1 (relating to drivers in 20250SB1099PN1329 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 organized motorcycle processions), which shall not be interrupted by any vehicle other than an emergency vehicle.Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB1099PN1329 - 4 - 123